Wyoming, session 2025, HB0333.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 28-8-114 by creating a new subsection
(b), by amending and renumbering (b) as (c), by renumbering
(c) as (d), by amending and renumbering (d) as (e) and by a
creating new subsection (f) is amended to read:

HB0333

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0799
28-8-114. Legal actions authorized; employment of
counsel; creation of an account; authorizing the use of
funds.

(b) The legislature finds that article 1, section 8
and article 4, section 3 of the United States constitution
recognizes the jurisdiction of the Wyoming legislature over
land within the boundaries of the state of Wyoming. The
Wyoming act of admission in section 1 recognizes that the
state of Wyoming is admitted into the union upon equal
footing with the original states in all respects
whatsoever. Being a coequal branch of government, the
legislature finds that federal land use plans within the
state of Wyoming are matters of great public interest and
importance. The legislature has a sufficient interest in
the proper interpretation and administration of the
National Environmental Policy Act, the Federal Land Policy
and Management Act, the National Historic Preservation Act,
the Endangered Species Act, the Clean Air Act, the Clean
Water Act and other federal acts to provide standing for
the legislature to prosecute actions for declaratory
judgment to protect its interests and the interests of the
public.
HB0333

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0799

(b)(c) The legislature by a majority vote of the
members of both houses when in session, or the management
council by the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) a
majority of the members of the council during the interim,
is authorized to commence and prosecute an action for
declaratory judgment in the courts of this state, or of the
United States, when such action is deemed necessary or
advisable to protect the rights, powers and interests of
the legislature or assure proper interpretation or
administration of the constitution, statutes, or
administrative rules and federal acts, including federal
purchases of land within the state of Wyoming. The
legislature shall have standing and may use funds for
litigation purposes in accordance with subsection (f) of
this section to prosecute actions for declaratory judgment.

(c)(d) The legislature may by resolution direct the
management council to prosecute an action. The management
council may commence an action upon its own motion.

(d)(e) The legislature or the management council may
direct the legal staff of the legislative service office to
HB0333

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0799
commence and prosecute the an action, or it may employ
private counsel for such purposes, as it deems advisable.

(f) The management council, on behalf of the
legislature, is authorized to utilize an amount not to
exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000.00) at any
one (1) time, or however much is available, to take any of
the actions specified in this section.

Section 2. There is appropriated seventy-five million
dollars ($75,000,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for litigation purposes for the
legislature as specified in this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning with the effective date
of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0333